Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2284.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 25MUNICIPAL PATROL SERVICESSec.2501. Scope of chapter.2502. Definitions.2503. State Police patrol services fee.2504. Reduction or elimination of fee.2505. State Police patrol services agreements.2506. Allocation of money.12345678910111213141516171819 2507. Annual reports by State Police.2508. Intermunicipal police response.2509. Penalties.2510. Applicability.§ 2501. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to municipal patrol services.§ 2502. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commissioner." The Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police."Institutionalized population." Persons who are primarily ineligible, unable or unlikely to participate in the labor force while residents of institutional group quarters, including adult correctional facilities, juvenile facilities, skilled nursing facilities and other institutional facilities such as mental hospitals and in-patient hospice facilities."Local full-time patrol services." Patrol services provided by a municipality for a period of 24 hours per day and seven days per week through the municipality's local police department, through participation in a regional police department or through a contract with other municipal or regional police departments."Local part-time patrol services." Patrol services for a period of less than 24 hours per day and less than seven days per week provided by a municipality through the municipality's local police department, participation in a regional police department or through a contract with other municipal or regional police departments.20260HB2284PN2990 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Patrol services." Police services provided to protect public safety by maintaining order, protecting people and property and enforcing motor vehicle and criminal laws through routine visits through a municipality."State Police." The Pennsylvania State Police."State Police full-time patrol services." Patrol services provided by the Pennsylvania State Police to a municipality for a period of 24 hours per day and seven days per week in a municipality that does not have local full-time patrol services."State Police part-time patrol services." Patrol services provided by the Pennsylvania State Police that supplement the local part-time patrol services provided in a municipality.§ 2503. State Police patrol services fee.(a) State Police full-time patrol services.--Except for a municipality that is subject to section 2505 (relating to State Police patrol services agreements), each municipality that receives State Police full-time patrol services shall pay the fee under subsection (c) for the State Police full-time patrol services provided in the previous calendar year.(b) State Police part-time patrol services.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), each municipality that receives State Police part-time patrol services shall pay the fee under subsection (c) for State Police part-time patrol services provided in the previous calendar year.(2) (i) The following municipalities shall be exempt from paying the fee for service under paragraph (1):(A) A municipality that is subject to section 2505.(B) A municipality with a population of 1,000 or 20260HB2284PN2990 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 less that provides local part-time patrol services for at least 40 hours per week.(C) A municipality with a population of more than 1,000 but less than 3,500 that provides local part-time patrol services for at least 80 hours per week.(D) A municipality with a population equal to or greater than 3,500 that meets the requirement under clause (C) and provides local part-time patrol services for an additional 40 hours per week for each 2,500 in population greater than 3,500.(ii) A municipality that qualifies for an exemption under subparagraph (i)(D) shall not be considered to provide local full-time patrol services.(c) Fees.--(1) The total annual fee assessed by the commissioner for all municipalities subject to subsections (a) and (b) shall be equal to the appropriation to the State Police from the Motor License Fund during fiscal year 2021-2022 less the appropriation to the State Police from the Motor License Fund beginning during the calendar year during which the services are provided.(2) Each municipality subject to subsection (a) or (b) shall be assessed a portion of the total annual fee under paragraph (1) on a per capita basis, except that a municipality that receives State Police part-time patrol services shall pay a fee of one-third per capita of the rate assessed to municipalities that receive State Police full-time patrol services. The population figures for each municipality shall be based upon the most recent Federal 20260HB2284PN2990 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 decennial census but shall not include the institutionalized population.(d) Determination and payment.--(1) The commissioner shall determine whether a municipality receives State Police full-time patrol services or State Police part-time patrol services and shall maintain a list of those municipalities. The commissioner shall make the list available to municipal officials.(2) The commissioner shall submit an invoice by February 1 each year for State Police full-time patrol services or State Police part-time patrol services provided in the preceding calendar year to each municipality determined under paragraph (1). The fee for services shall be paid on a quarterly basis in equal installments to the Commonwealth beginning July 1.(e) Applicability.--A municipality that is classified as distressed under the act of July 10, 1987 (P.L.246, No.47), known as the Municipalities Financial Recovery Act, shall not be required to pay the fee under this section.§ 2504. Reduction or elimination of fee.If a municipality that is paying a fee under section 2503 (relating to State Police patrol services fee) institutes local full-time patrol services or local part-time patrol services during the calendar year sufficient to cause a reduction or elimination in the fee owed by the municipality, the commissioner shall adjust the fee to reflect the municipality's local full-time patrol services or local part-time patrol services during that portion of the year.§ 2505. State Police patrol services agreements.(a) Contract requirement.--A municipality that eliminates 20260HB2284PN2990 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 local full-time patrol services or local part-time patrol services after the effective date of this subsection shall enter into an agreement with the State Police for State Police full-time patrol services or State Police part-time patrol services on terms established by the commissioner.(b) Fees.--The commissioner shall establish a reasonable fee and payment schedule for State Police full-time patrol services or State Police part-time patrol services provided under subsection (a). In setting the fee, the commissioner may consider all of the following regarding a municipality:(1) Population.(2) Square mileage.(3) Crime rates.(4) Other factors deemed relevant by the commissioner.(c) Term and renewal.--An agreement under this section shall have a term of one year and may be renewed for additional terms in accordance with the provisions of this section.(d) Local patrol services.--Upon the expiration of an agreement under this section, a municipality may provide for local full-time patrol services or local part-time patrol services. The municipality shall provide to the commissioner documentation of local full-time patrol services or local part-time patrol services.§ 2506. Allocation of money.Money collected under sections 2503 (relating to State Police patrol services fee) and 2505 (relating to State Police patrol services agreements) shall be deposited into the General Fund for the cost of State Police operations and shall result in a corresponding amount of money allocated from the Motor License Fund for State Police services.20260HB2284PN2990 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 2507. Annual reports by State Police.The commissioner shall prepare and disseminate an annual report to each municipality paying a fee under section 2503 (relating to State Police patrol services fee) or 2505 (relating to State Police patrol services agreements). The report shall include:(1) Total hours patrolled.(2) Dates and times patrolled.(3) Number of incidents to which the State Police responded.(4) Number of agreements and amount of fees paid under section 2505.§ 2508. Intermunicipal police response.If a municipality or regional police force providing local full-time patrol services or local part-time patrol services is requested by the State Police to respond to an incident within another municipality that receives State Police full-time patrol services or State Police part-time patrol services, the municipality or regional police force may levy a per-incident fee or hourly fee on the other municipality.§ 2509. Penalties.(a) Ineligibility.--A municipality failing to enter into an agreement under section 2505 (relating to State Police patrol services agreements) or make a payment under section 2503 (relating to State Police patrol services fee) or 2505 shall be ineligible for funding under 75 Pa.C.S. § 9010 (relating to disposition and use of tax) until the outstanding balance owed is paid in full.(b) Extension for emergency.--Upon declaration of a local emergency, as defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7102 (relating to 20260HB2284PN2990 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 definitions), a municipality may request from the commissioner an extension of time for payment.§ 2510. Applicability.This chapter shall apply to the State Police full-time patrol services or State Police part-time patrol services provided in the calendar year beginning after the year in which this section takes effect.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2284PN2990 - 8 - 123456789